Massachusetts, session 194th, H1698.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 of chapter 210 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following paragraph :— 
A person of full age may petition the probate court for the adoption of an embryo. Donors 
in creation of the embryo cannot be held financially liable for things including but not limited to 
child support and medical bills.